Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.020

Definitions. (Effective until July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5375.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1028.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, female genital mutilation as defined in RCW 18.130.460, or injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen years of age.

(3) "Child forensic interview" means a developmentally sensitive and legally sound method of gathering factual information regarding allegations of child abuse, child neglect, or exposure to violence. This interview is conducted by a competently trained, neutral professional utilizing techniques informed by research and best practice as part of a larger investigative process.

(4) "Child protective services" means those services provided by the department designed to protect children from child abuse and neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.

(5) "Child protective services section" means the child protective services section of the department.

(6) "Child who is a candidate for foster care" means a child who the department identifies as being at imminent risk of entering foster care but who can remain safely in the child's home or in a kinship placement as long as services or programs that are necessary to prevent entry of the child into foster care are provided, and includes but is not limited to a child whose adoption or guardianship arrangement is at risk of a disruption or dissolution that would result in a foster care placement. The term includes a child for whom there is reasonable cause to believe that any of the following circumstances exist:

(a) The child has been abandoned by the parent as defined in RCW 13.34.030 and the child's health, safety, and welfare is seriously endangered as a result;

(b) The child has been abused or neglected as defined in this chapter and the child's health, safety, and welfare is seriously endangered as a result;

(c) There is no parent capable of meeting the child's needs such that the child is in circumstances that constitute a serious danger to the child's development;

(d) The child is otherwise at imminent risk of harm.

(7) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused facility in good standing with the state chapter for children's advocacy centers and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for the investigation, prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types of child abuse. Children's advocacy centers provide a location for forensic interviews and coordinate access to services such as, but not limited to, medical evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by multidisciplinary teams within the context of county protocols as defined in RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.185.

(8) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(9) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile department.

(10) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(11) "Experiencing homelessness" means lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, including circumstances such as sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, fleeing domestic violence, or a similar reason as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (Title 42 U.S.C., chapter 119, subchapter I) as it existed on January 1, 2021.

(12) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent maltreatment.

(13) "Family assessment response" means a way of responding to certain reports of child abuse or neglect made under this chapter using a differential response approach to child protective services. The family assessment response shall focus on the safety of the child, the integrity and preservation of the family, and shall assess the status of the child and the family in terms of risk of abuse and neglect including the parent's or guardian's or other caretaker's capacity and willingness to protect the child and, if necessary, plan and arrange the provision of services to reduce the risk and otherwise support the family. No one is named as a perpetrator, and no investigative finding is entered in the record as a result of a family assessment.

(14) "Founded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that, based on available information, it is more likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.

(15) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an investigation by the department of social and health services, prior to October 1, 2008, that based on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.

(16) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.

(17) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(18) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or design to intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.

(19) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment. Poverty, experiencing homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence as defined in RCW 7.105.010 that is perpetrated against someone other than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment in and of itself.

(20) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(21) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.

(22) "Prevention and family services and programs" means specific mental health prevention and treatment services, substance abuse prevention and treatment services, and in-home parent skill-based programs that qualify for federal funding under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. For purposes of this chapter, prevention and family services and programs are not remedial services or family reunification services as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(23) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility personnel, and school nurses.

(24) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(25) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for investigation.

(26) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any person.

(27) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.

(28) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of children, or providing social services to adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(29) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that available information indicates that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

[ 2023 c 122 s 5. Prior: 2021 c 215 s 142; 2021 c 67 s 3; 2019 c 172 s 5; prior: 2018 c 284 s 33; (2018 c 284 s 32 expired July 1, 2018); 2018 c 171 s 3; (2018 c 171 s 2 expired July 1, 2018); 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 321; 2012 c 259 s 1; prior: 2010 c 176 s 1; 2009 c 520 s 17; 2007 c 220 s 1; 2006 c 339 s 108; (2006 c 339 s 107 expired January 1, 2007); 2005 c 512 s 5; 2000 c 162 s 19; 1999 c 176 s 29; 1998 c 314 s 7; prior: 1997 c 386 s 45; 1997 c 386 s 24; 1997 c 282 s 4; 1997 c 132 s 2; 1996 c 178 s 10; prior: 1993 c 412 s 12; 1993 c 402 s 1; 1988 c 142 s 1; prior: 1987 c 524 s 9; 1987 c 206 s 2; 1984 c 97 s 2; 1982 c 129 s 6; 1981 c 164 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 25; 1975 1st ex.s. c 217 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 35 s 2; 1965 c 13 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 122: See notes following RCW 9A.36.170.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective date—2018 c 284 ss 3, 8, 13, 20, 33, 36, and 67: See note following RCW 13.34.030.

Expiration date—2018 c 284 ss 2, 7, 12, 19, 32, 35, and 66: See note following RCW 13.34.030.

Effective date—2018 c 171 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 171 s 10.]

Expiration date—2018 c 171 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 171 s 9.]

Effective date—2018 c 171: See note following RCW 26.44.188.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—2012 c 259 ss 1 and 3-10: "Sections 1 and 3 through 10 of this act take effect December 1, 2013." [ 2012 c 259 s 15.]

Effective date—2007 c 220 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect October 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 220 s 10.]

Implementation—2007 c 220 ss 1-3: "The secretary of the department of social and health services may take the necessary steps to ensure that sections 1 through 3 of this act are implemented on their effective date." [ 2007 c 220 s 11.]

Effective date—2006 c 339 s 108: "Section 108 of this act takes effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 339 s 404.]

Expiration date—2006 c 339 s 107: "Section 107 of this act expires January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 339 s 403.]

Intent—Part headings not law—2006 c 339: See notes following RCW 74.34.020.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—Short title—2005 c 512: See notes following RCW 26.44.100.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1999 c 176: See notes following RCW 74.34.005.

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.

Findings—1997 c 132: "The legislature finds that housing is frequently influenced by the economic situation faced by the family. This may include siblings sharing a bedroom. The legislature also finds that the family living situation due to economic circumstances in and of itself is not sufficient to justify a finding of child abuse, negligent treatment, or maltreatment." [ 1997 c 132 s 1.]

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.

Severability—1982 c 129: See note following RCW 9A.04.080.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.

PDFRCW 26.44.020

Definitions. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5375.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1028.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Abuse or neglect" means sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, female genital mutilation as defined in RCW 18.130.460, trafficking as described in RCW 9A.40.100, sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking in persons under the trafficking victims protection act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. Sec. 7101 et seq., or injury of a child by any person under circumstances which cause harm to the child's health, welfare, or safety, excluding conduct permitted under RCW 9A.16.100; or the negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child by a person responsible for or providing care to the child. An abused child is a child who has been subjected to child abuse or neglect as defined in this section.

(2) "Child" or "children" means any person under the age of eighteen years of age.

(3) "Child forensic interview" means a developmentally sensitive and legally sound method of gathering factual information regarding allegations of child abuse, child neglect, or exposure to violence. This interview is conducted by a competently trained, neutral professional utilizing techniques informed by research and best practice as part of a larger investigative process.

(4) "Child protective services" means those services provided by the department designed to protect children from child abuse and neglect and safeguard such children from future abuse and neglect, and conduct investigations of child abuse and neglect reports. Investigations may be conducted regardless of the location of the alleged abuse or neglect. Child protective services includes referral to services to ameliorate conditions that endanger the welfare of children, the coordination of necessary programs and services relevant to the prevention, intervention, and treatment of child abuse and neglect, and services to children to ensure that each child has a permanent home. In determining whether protective services should be provided, the department shall not decline to provide such services solely because of the child's unwillingness or developmental inability to describe the nature and severity of the abuse or neglect.

(5) "Child protective services section" means the child protective services section of the department.

(6) "Child who is a candidate for foster care" means a child who the department identifies as being at imminent risk of entering foster care but who can remain safely in the child's home or in a kinship placement as long as services or programs that are necessary to prevent entry of the child into foster care are provided, and includes but is not limited to a child whose adoption or guardianship arrangement is at risk of a disruption or dissolution that would result in a foster care placement. The term includes a child for whom there is reasonable cause to believe that any of the following circumstances exist:

(a) The child has been abandoned by the parent as defined in RCW 13.34.030 and the child's health, safety, and welfare is seriously endangered as a result;

(b) The child has been abused or neglected as defined in this chapter and the child's health, safety, and welfare is seriously endangered as a result;

(c) There is no parent capable of meeting the child's needs such that the child is in circumstances that constitute a serious danger to the child's development;

(d) The child is otherwise at imminent risk of harm.

(7) "Children's advocacy center" means a child-focused facility in good standing with the state chapter for children's advocacy centers and that coordinates a multidisciplinary process for the investigation, prosecution, and treatment of sexual and other types of child abuse. Children's advocacy centers provide a location for forensic interviews and coordinate access to services such as, but not limited to, medical evaluations, advocacy, therapy, and case review by multidisciplinary teams within the context of county protocols as defined in RCW 26.44.180 and 26.44.185.

(8) "Clergy" means any regularly licensed or ordained minister, priest, or rabbi of any church or religious denomination, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(9) "Court" means the superior court of the state of Washington, juvenile department.

(10) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(11) "Experiencing homelessness" means lacking a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence, including circumstances such as sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, fleeing domestic violence, or a similar reason as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (Title 42 U.S.C., chapter 119, subchapter I) as it existed on January 1, 2021.

(12) "Family assessment" means a comprehensive assessment of child safety, risk of subsequent child abuse or neglect, and family strengths and needs that is applied to a child abuse or neglect report. Family assessment does not include a determination as to whether child abuse or neglect occurred, but does determine the need for services to address the safety of the child and the risk of subsequent maltreatment.

(13) "Family assessment response" means a way of responding to certain reports of child abuse or neglect made under this chapter using a differential response approach to child protective services. The family assessment response shall focus on the safety of the child, the integrity and preservation of the family, and shall assess the status of the child and the family in terms of risk of abuse and neglect including the parent's or guardian's or other caretaker's capacity and willingness to protect the child and, if necessary, plan and arrange the provision of services to reduce the risk and otherwise support the family. No one is named as a perpetrator, and no investigative finding is entered in the record as a result of a family assessment.

(14) "Founded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that, based on available information, it is more likely than not that child abuse or neglect did occur.

(15) "Inconclusive" means the determination following an investigation by the department of social and health services, prior to October 1, 2008, that based on available information a decision cannot be made that more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did or did not occur.

(16) "Institution" means a private or public hospital or any other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care.

(17) "Law enforcement agency" means the police department, the prosecuting attorney, the state patrol, the director of public safety, or the office of the sheriff.

(18) "Malice" or "maliciously" means an intent, wish, or design to intimidate, annoy, or injure another person. Such malice may be inferred from an act done in willful disregard of the rights of another, or an act wrongfully done without just cause or excuse, or an act or omission of duty betraying a willful disregard of social duty.

(19) "Negligent treatment or maltreatment" means an act or a failure to act, or the cumulative effects of a pattern of conduct, behavior, or inaction, that evidences a serious disregard of consequences of such magnitude as to constitute a clear and present danger to a child's health, welfare, or safety, including but not limited to conduct prohibited under RCW 9A.42.100. When considering whether a clear and present danger exists, evidence of a parent's substance abuse as a contributing factor to negligent treatment or maltreatment shall be given great weight. The fact that siblings share a bedroom is not, in and of itself, negligent treatment or maltreatment. Poverty, experiencing homelessness, or exposure to domestic violence as defined in RCW 7.105.010 that is perpetrated against someone other than the child does not constitute negligent treatment or maltreatment in and of itself.

(20) "Pharmacist" means any registered pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(21) "Practitioner of the healing arts" or "practitioner" means a person licensed by this state to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, optometry, chiropractic, nursing, dentistry, osteopathic medicine and surgery, or medicine and surgery or to provide other health services. The term "practitioner" includes a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner. A person who is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited Christian Science practitioner will not be considered, for that reason alone, a neglected person for the purposes of this chapter.

(22) "Prevention and family services and programs" means specific mental health prevention and treatment services, substance abuse prevention and treatment services, and in-home parent skill-based programs that qualify for federal funding under the federal family first prevention services act, P.L. 115-123. For purposes of this chapter, prevention and family services and programs are not remedial services or family reunification services as described in RCW 13.34.025(2).

(23) "Professional school personnel" include, but are not limited to, teachers, counselors, administrators, child care facility personnel, and school nurses.

(24) "Psychologist" means any person licensed to practice psychology under chapter 18.83 RCW, whether acting in an individual capacity or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(25) "Screened-out report" means a report of alleged child abuse or neglect that the department has determined does not rise to the level of a credible report of abuse or neglect and is not referred for investigation.

(26) "Sexual exploitation" includes: (a) Allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution by any person; or (b) allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in the obscene or pornographic photographing, filming, or depicting of a child by any person.

(27) "Sexually aggressive youth" means a child who is defined in RCW 74.13.075(1)(b) as being a sexually aggressive youth.

(28) "Social service counselor" means anyone engaged in a professional capacity during the regular course of employment in encouraging or promoting the health, welfare, support, or education of children, or providing social services to adults or families, including mental health, drug and alcohol treatment, and domestic violence programs, whether in an individual capacity, or as an employee or agent of any public or private organization or institution.

(29) "Unfounded" means the determination following an investigation by the department that available information indicates that, more likely than not, child abuse or neglect did not occur, or that there is insufficient evidence for the department to determine whether the alleged child abuse did or did not occur.

[ 2024 c 298 s 5; 2023 c 122 s 5. Prior: 2021 c 215 s 142; 2021 c 67 s 3; 2019 c 172 s 5; prior: 2018 c 284 s 33; (2018 c 284 s 32 expired July 1, 2018); 2018 c 171 s 3; (2018 c 171 s 2 expired July 1, 2018); 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 321; 2012 c 259 s 1; prior: 2010 c 176 s 1; 2009 c 520 s 17; 2007 c 220 s 1; 2006 c 339 s 108; (2006 c 339 s 107 expired January 1, 2007); 2005 c 512 s 5; 2000 c 162 s 19; 1999 c 176 s 29; 1998 c 314 s 7; prior: 1997 c 386 s 45; 1997 c 386 s 24; 1997 c 282 s 4; 1997 c 132 s 2; 1996 c 178 s 10; prior: 1993 c 412 s 12; 1993 c 402 s 1; 1988 c 142 s 1; prior: 1987 c 524 s 9; 1987 c 206 s 2; 1984 c 97 s 2; 1982 c 129 s 6; 1981 c 164 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 80 s 25; 1975 1st ex.s. c 217 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 35 s 2; 1965 c 13 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 298: See note following RCW 9A.40.100.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 122: See notes following RCW 9A.36.170.

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.

Effective date—2018 c 284 ss 3, 8, 13, 20, 33, 36, and 67: See note following RCW 13.34.030.

Expiration date—2018 c 284 ss 2, 7, 12, 19, 32, 35, and 66: See note following RCW 13.34.030.

Effective date—2018 c 171 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 171 s 10.]

Expiration date—2018 c 171 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2018." [ 2018 c 171 s 9.]

Effective date—2018 c 171: See note following RCW 26.44.188.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Effective date—2012 c 259 ss 1 and 3-10: "Sections 1 and 3 through 10 of this act take effect December 1, 2013." [ 2012 c 259 s 15.]

Effective date—2007 c 220 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect October 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 220 s 10.]

Implementation—2007 c 220 ss 1-3: "The secretary of the department of social and health services may take the necessary steps to ensure that sections 1 through 3 of this act are implemented on their effective date." [ 2007 c 220 s 11.]

Effective date—2006 c 339 s 108: "Section 108 of this act takes effect January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 339 s 404.]

Expiration date—2006 c 339 s 107: "Section 107 of this act expires January 1, 2007." [ 2006 c 339 s 403.]

Intent—Part headings not law—2006 c 339: See notes following RCW 74.34.020.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—Short title—2005 c 512: See notes following RCW 26.44.100.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—1999 c 176: See notes following RCW 74.34.005.

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.

Findings—1997 c 132: "The legislature finds that housing is frequently influenced by the economic situation faced by the family. This may include siblings sharing a bedroom. The legislature also finds that the family living situation due to economic circumstances in and of itself is not sufficient to justify a finding of child abuse, negligent treatment, or maltreatment." [ 1997 c 132 s 1.]

Effective date—1996 c 178: See note following RCW 18.35.110.

Severability—1982 c 129: See note following RCW 9A.04.080.

Purpose—Intent—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 80: See notes following RCW 4.16.190.